Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.160

State health care cost containment policies.

(1) It is the purpose of this section to ensure implementation and coordination of chapter 70.14 RCW as well as other legislative and executive policies designed to contain the cost of health care that is purchased or provided by the state. In order to achieve that purpose, the director may:

(a) Establish within the health care authority a health care cost containment program in cooperation with all state agencies;

(b) Implement lawful health care cost containment policies that have been adopted by the legislature or the governor, including appropriation provisos;

(c) Coordinate the activities of all state agencies with respect to health care cost containment policies;

(d) Study and make recommendations on health care cost containment policies;

(e) Monitor and report on the implementation of health care cost containment policies;

(f) Appoint a health care cost containment technical advisory committee that represents state agencies that are involved in the direct purchase, funding, or provision of health care; and

(g) Engage in other activities necessary to achieve the purposes of this section.

(2) All state agencies shall cooperate with the director in carrying out the purpose of this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 70; 1986 c 303 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Health care authority: Chapter 41.05 RCW.